Maine, session 132, LD1885.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §6203-D, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 284, §8, is amended
to read:
1. Fund established. There is established the Land for Maine's Future Trust Fund that
is administered by the board. The Land for Maine's Future Trust Fund consists of the
proceeds from the sale of any bonds authorized for the purposes set forth in subsection 2,
eligible investment earnings of funds established under this chapter, revenue from the tax
imposed on real property pursuant to Title 36, section 459 and any funds received as
contributions from private and public sources for the purposes set forth in subsection 2.
The Land for Maine's Future Trust Fund must be held separate and apart from all other
money, funds and accounts and eligible investment earnings credited to the assets of the
Land for Maine's Future Trust Fund become part of the assets of that fund. Any balance
remaining in the Land for Maine's Future Trust Fund at the end of any fiscal year must be
carried forward for the next fiscal year.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §15009 is enacted to read:
§15009. Early Childhood Education Fund
1. Fund established. The Early Childhood Education Fund, referred to in this section
as "the fund," is established as an Other Special Revenue Funds account for the purposes
specified in this section.
2. Source of revenue; nonlapsing. The fund is funded by revenue from the tax
imposed on real property pursuant to Title 36, section 459. Any unexpended balances in
the fund may not lapse but must be carried forward.
3. Fund to be used to increase funding for early childhood education programs.
Allocations from the fund must be used to provide funds for the purpose of expanding or
developing early childhood education programs, as determined by the commissioner.
4. Report by State Controller. The State Controller shall report at least annually on
the fund on or before the 2nd Friday in November to the joint standing committees of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over appropriations and financial affairs and education
matters. The report must summarize the status of and activity in the fund, including
amounts distributed and how the recipients of those funds used the funds to expand or
develop early childhood education programs.
5. Transfer for payments. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
State Controller shall transfer from the balance available in the fund to the department an
amount for use as specified in subsection 3. Amounts transferred may be expended based
on allotment established by financial order upon recommendation by the State Budget
Officer and approval by the Governor. The amounts transferred are considered adjustments
to allocations. The Governor shall inform the Legislative Council and the joint standing
committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over appropriations and financial affairs
and education matters immediately upon such a transfer from the fund.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §15699 is enacted to read:
§15699. Fund for Essential Programs and Services
Page 1 - 132LR1550(01)

1. Fund established. The Fund for Essential Programs and Services, referred to in
this section as "the fund," is established as an Other Special Revenue Funds account for the
purposes specified in this section.
2. Source of revenue; nonlapsing. The fund is funded by revenue from the tax
imposed on real property pursuant to Title 36, section 459. Any unexpended balances in
the fund may not lapse but must be carried forward.
3. Fund to be used to increase state share percentage for below target school
administrative units. Allocations from the fund must be used to provide funds to school
administrative units that do not achieve the annual target for the state share percentage of
the statewide adjusted total cost of the components of essential programs and services as
specified in section 15671, subsection 7, paragraph B, subparagraph (17), if that shortage
is the result of a municipality within that school administrative unit having a higher poverty
rate than the median poverty rate for the State and a lower median income rate than the
median income rate for the State. If insufficient funds are available to increase all such
school administrative units to the annual target, the commissioner shall use the funds in the
fund to equalize, to the extent possible, the percentage of the target for all such school
administrative units.
4. Report by State Controller. The State Controller shall report at least annually on
the fund on or before the 2nd Friday in November to the joint standing committees of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over appropriations and financial affairs and education
matters. The report must summarize the status of and activity in the fund, including the
amounts provided to each school administrative unit under subsection 3 and the percentage
of the state share of the total cost of funding public education from kindergarten to grade
12, as described by the Essential Programs and Services Funding Act, that school
administrative unit attained.
5. Transfer for payments. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the
State Controller shall transfer from the balance available in the fund an amount for essential
programs and services payments to the department for use as specified in subsection 3.
Amounts transferred may be expended based on allotment established by financial order
upon recommendation by the State Budget Officer and approval by the Governor. The
amounts transferred are considered adjustments to allocations. The Governor shall inform
the Legislative Council and the joint standing committees of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over appropriations and financial affairs and education matters immediately
upon such a transfer from the fund.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §459 is enacted to read:
§459. Statewide property tax
For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2026, for the purpose of all real
estate in this State that is subject to a Maine property tax, including real estate in a
municipality or the unorganized territory, that real estate is subject to taxation pursuant to
this section, and that tax is referred to in this section as "the statewide property tax."
1. Taxable year. The taxable year is from April 1st to April 1st. The status of all
taxpayers must be fixed as of April 1st annually.
2. Rate of tax; additional to other property taxes. The statewide property tax is
assessed at the rate of 5 mills applied to 100% valuation of the statewide valuation on all
Page 2 - 132LR1550(01)

415 real estate in this State not exempt from the assessment of tax. The statewide property tax
426 is in addition to any other tax imposed on real estate in this State, either by a municipality
437 or the State. As used in this section, "statewide valuation" means the state valuation, as
448 defined in section 381, for the unorganized territory and the local assessed valuation for
459 municipalities.
3. Determination of statewide property tax assessment. The State Tax Assessor
shall determine the amount of the statewide property tax due from each taxpayer based
upon the rate established in subsection 2. The State Tax Assessor shall notify each taxpayer
in writing, not later than August 1st annually.
4. Due dates; interest. Taxes levied under this section must be paid to the State Tax
Assessor on or before October 1st of each year. A person who fails to pay the tax on or
before October 1st is liable for interest at the maximum rate posted on the Treasurer of
State's publicly accessible website according to section 505, subsection 4.
5. Exemption and amount; eligibility; administration. The just value of up to
$1,000,000 of a homestead subject to tax under this section is exempt from the tax imposed
pursuant to this section as provided in this subsection.
A. A permanent resident who receives an exemption under the Maine resident
homestead property tax exemption under chapter 105, subchapter 4-B is eligible for
the exemption provided pursuant to this subsection.
B. For purposes of administration, the State Tax Assessor shall administer the
exemption under this subsection in the same manner as the assessor administers the
Maine resident homestead property tax exemption under chapter 105, subchapter 4-B
for homesteads located in the unorganized territory.
C. The exemption provided in this subsection applies only to the tax imposed pursuant
to this section.
6. Administration. For purposes of administration of this section, including, without
limitation, the assessment of the statewide property tax, warrants, levy, change of
ownership, interest and foreclosure, except when specifically provided, the provisions of
law that apply to the levy of property taxes by municipalities and in the unorganized
territory apply to this section, and the State Tax Assessor shall administer the statewide
property tax accordingly.
7. Distribution of revenue. Revenue from the statewide property tax must be
distributed as follows.
A. Fifty percent must be transferred on at least an annual basis to the Fund for Essential
Programs and Services established in Title 20-A, section 15699.
B. Forty percent must be transferred on at least an annual basis to the Early Childhood
Education Fund established in Title 20-A, section 15009.
C. Ten percent must be transferred on at least an annual basis to the Land for Maine's
Future Trust Fund established in Title 5, section 6203-D, subsection 1.
8. Annual report. Beginning November 1, 2026 and annually thereafter, the State
Tax Assessor shall report to the joint standing committees of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over appropriations and financial affairs, education matters and taxation
matters regarding the amount of revenue generated by the statewide property tax, the
Page 3 - 132LR1550(01)

414 amounts distributed pursuant to subsection 7 and any recommendations for improving the
425 administration of the statewide property tax. Each joint standing committee may submit a
436 bill to the legislative session that convenes immediately following the submission of the
447 report.